test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-muorra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - muorra: # N_EVEN
    muorra+N+Sg+Nom: muorra
    muorra+N+Sg+Gen: muora
    muorra+N+Sg+Acc: muorav
    muorra+N+Sg+Ill: muorraj
    muorra+N+Sg+Ine: muoran
    muorra+N+Sg+Ela: [muorast, muoras]
    muorra+N+Sg+Com: [muorajn, muorajna]
    muorra+N+Pl+Nom: muora
    muorra+N+Pl+Gen: muoraj
    muorra+N+Pl+Acc: muorajd
    muorra+N+Pl+Ill: muorajda
    muorra+N+Pl+Ine: muorajn
    muorra+N+Pl+Ela: [muorajst, muorajs]
    muorra+N+Pl+Com: [muoraj, muorajgum]
    muorra+N+Ess: muorran
    muorra+N+Abe: muoradak
